indonesian.lexc
Multichar_Symbols

! tag suffixes for the upper side
+Bare +-an +redup[-] +ke-an +ber-an +per-an +peN-an
+meN- +meN-i +meN-kan +meN[redup[-]] +meN[redup[-]]kan
+ber- +per- +ter- +peN-
+meNper- +peNper- +peNper-an

! flag diacritics
@P.PREF.peN@ @R.PREF.peN@
@P.PREF.ter@ @R.PREF.ter@
@P.PREF.ber@ @R.PREF.ber@
@P.PREF.per@ @R.PREF.per@
@P.PREF.ke@ @R.PREF.ke@
@P.PREF.redup[-]@ @R.PREF.redup[-]@
@P.PREF.meN@ @R.PREF.meN@
@P.PREF.meN[redup[-]]@ @R.PREF.meN[redup[-]]@
@P.PREF.meNper@ @R.PREF.meNper@
@P.PREF.peNper@ @R.PREF.peNper@
@P.PREF.mem@ @R.PREF.mem@
@P.PREF.meng@ @R.PREF.meng@
@P.PREF.menge@ @R.PREF.menge@
@P.PREF.menge[redup[-]]@ @R.PREF.menge[redup[-]]@
@P.PREF.bel@ @R.PREF.bel@
@P.PREF.pel@ @R.PREF.pel@
@P.PREF.penge@ @R.PREF.penge@
@D.PREF@

! morphophoneme
^N ! underspecified nasal
^R ! reduplication hyphen

!********* end of Multichar_Symbols************

LEXICON Root
Prefixes ;

LEXICON Prefixes
Stems ;
< [ 0 .x. p e "^N" ] "@P.PREF.peN@" > Stems ;
< [ 0 .x. t e r ] "@P.PREF.ter@" > Stems ;
< [ 0 .x. b e r ] "@P.PREF.ber@" > Stems ;
< [ 0 .x. p e r ] "@P.PREF.per@" > Stems ;
< [ 0 .x. k e ] "@P.PREF.ke@" > Stems ;
< [ 0 .x. "<" ] "@P.PREF.redup[-]@" > Stems ;
< [ 0 .x. m e "^N" ] "@P.PREF.meN@" > Stems ;
< [ 0 .x. m e "^N" "<" ] "@P.PREF.meN[redup[-]]@" > Stems ;
< [ 0 .x. m e m p e r ] "@P.PREF.meNper@" > Stems ;
< [ 0 .x. p e m e r ] "@P.PREF.peNper@" > Stems ;
< [ 0 .x. m e m ] "@P.PREF.mem@" > Stems ;
< [ 0 .x. m e n g ] "@P.PREF.meng@" > Stems ;
< [ 0 .x. m e n g e ] "@P.PREF.menge@" > Stems ;
< [ 0 .x. m e "<" n g e ] "@P.PREF.menge[redup[-]]@" > Stems ;
< [ 0 .x. b e l ] "@P.PREF.bel@" > Stems ;
< [ 0 .x. p e l ] "@P.PREF.pel@" > Stems ;
< [ 0 .x. p e n g e ] "@P.PREF.penge@" > Stems ;

LEXICON Stems
kecil bare ;
bagi -an ;
giat ke-an ;
usaha per-an ;

renang ber- ;
rusak per- ;
rasa ter- ;
serta ber- ;

terbang ber-an ;
kerja per-an ;

pergok ter- ;
percaya ter- ;

ajar bel- ;
ajar pel-an ;

ajar meN- ;
ekspor meN- ;
erang meN- ;
olah meN- ;
urus meN- ;

beli meN- ;
pakai meN- ;
fitnah meN- ;

dengar meN- ;
tulis meN- ;
cari meN- ;
jual meN- ;

syarat meN-kan ;
ziarah meN-i ;

sewa meN- ;

ganggu meN- ;
kirim meN- ;
hilang meN- ;
khawatir meN-kan ;

lihat meN- ;
rasa meN- ;
masak meN- ;
nanti meN- ;
nyanyi meN- ;
nganga meN- ;
wakil meN-i ;
yakin meN-i ;

tulis peN- ;
tulis peN-an ;

lebar meNper- ;
oleh meNper- ;

percaya mem- ;

satu peNper- ;
oleh peNper-an ;
perkosa peN- ;

kritik meng- ;

bom menge- ;
pel menge- ;
cek menge- ;
sah menge-kan ;
rem menge- ;

bom penge-an ;
sah penge-an ;

bagi meN[redup[-]] ;
amat meN[redup[-]]i ;
minta meN[redup[-]] ;
pijit meN[redup[-]] ;
tulis meN[redup[-]] ;
kayuh meN[redup[-]] ;

cek menge[redup[-]] ;

LEXICON bare
< "+Bare":0 "@D.PREF@" > # ;

LEXICON -an
< [ "+-an" .x. a n ] "@D.PREF@" > # ;
! simple suffix blocks all prefixes

LEXICON ber-
< "+ber-":0 "@R.PREF.ber@" > # ;

LEXICON ter-
< "+ter-":0 "@R.PREF.ter@" > # ;

LEXICON per-
< "+per-":0 "@R.PREF.per@" > # ;

LEXICON peN-
< "+peN-":0 "@R.PREF.peN@" > # ;

LEXICON ke-an
< [ "+ke-an" .x. a n ] "@R.PREF.ke@" > # ;
! circumfix requires ke-

LEXICON ber-an
< [ "+ber-an" .x. a n ] "@R.PREF.ber@" > # ;

LEXICON per-an
< [ "+per-an" .x. a n ] "@R.PREF.per@" > # ;

LEXICON peN-an
< [ "+peN-an" .x. a n ] "@R.PREF.peN@" > # ;

LEXICON meN-
< "+meN-":0 "@R.PREF.meN@" > # ;
! require simple prefix, no phonological suffix

LEXICON meN-i
< "+meN-i":i "@R.PREF.meN@" > # ;

LEXICON redup[-]
< "+redup[-]" .x. ">" "<" "^R" ">" "@R.PREF.redup[-]@" > # ;

LEXICON meN-kan
< [ "+meN-kan" .x. k a n ] "@R.PREF.meN@" > # ;

LEXICON meNper-
< "+meNper-":0 "@R.PREF.meNper@" > # ;

LEXICON peNper-
< "+peNper-":0 "@R.PREF.peNper@" > # ;

LEXICON peNper-an
< [ "+peNper-an" .x. a n ] "@R.PREF.peNper@" > # ;

LEXICON meN[redup[-]]
< [ "+meN[redup[-]]" .x. ">" "<" "^R" ">" ] "@R.PREF.meN[redup[-]]@" > # ;

LEXICON meN[redup[-]]kan
< [ "+meN[redup[-]]kan" .x. ">" "<" "^R" ">" k a n ] "@R.PREF.meN[redup[-]]@" > # ;

LEXICON meN[redup[-]]i
< [ "+meN[redup[-]]i" .x. ">" "<" "^R" ">" i ] "@R.PREF.meN[redup[-]]@" > # ;

LEXICON mem-
< "+meN-":0 "@R.PREF.mem@" > # ;

LEXICON meng-
< "+meN-":0 "@R.PREF.meng@" > # ;

LEXICON menge-
< "+meN-":0 "@R.PREF.menge@" > # ;

LEXICON menge-kan
< [ "+meN-kan" .x. k a n ] "@R.PREF.menge@" > # ;

LEXICON menge[redup[-]]
< [ "+meN[redup[-]]" .x. ">" "<" "^R" ">" ] "@R.PREF.menge[redup[-]]@" > # ;

LEXICON bel-
< "+ber-":0 "@R.PREF.bel@" > # ;

LEXICON pel-an
< [ "+per-an" .x. a n ] "@R.PREF.pel@" > # ;

LEXICON penge-
< "+peN-":0 "@R.PREF.penge@" > # ;

LEXICON penge-an
< [ "+peN-an" .x. a n ] "@R.PREF.penge@" > # ;
